New York, session 2025-2026, S6845.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "moped 2 registration verification act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 391-v of the general business law is 4 amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 5 (e) "Worker" means a natural person who is hired or retained as an 6 independent contractor by a delivery business to make deliveries in 7 exchange for compensation. 8 § 3. Section 391-v of the general business law is amended by adding a 9 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 10 3. (a) A third-party food delivery service shall verify that any work- 11 er who elects to operate a limited-use motorcycle, as such term is 12 defined by section one hundred twenty-one-b of the vehicle and traffic 13 law, in the course of making deliveries for such third-party food deliv- 14 ery service has registered such limited-use motorcycle pursuant to 15 section twenty-two hundred sixty-one of the vehicle and traffic law or 16 registered pursuant to the applicable laws of another state. 17 (b) A third-party food delivery service shall verify that any worker 18 who elects to operate a motor vehicle, as such term is defined by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09233-14-6 S. 6845--B 2 1 section one hundred twenty-five of the vehicle and traffic law, in the 2 course of making deliveries for such third-party food delivery service 3 has registered such motor vehicle pursuant to section four hundred one 4 of the vehicle and traffic law or registered pursuant to the applicable 5 laws of another state. A third-party food delivery service may satisfy 6 the requirements of this paragraph if, as a condition in its agreement 7 with the worker, the third-party delivery service shall require that the 8 worker has registered the motor vehicle the worker elects to operate in 9 the course of making deliveries for such third-party food delivery 10 service pursuant to the vehicle and traffic law or to the applicable 11 laws of another state. 12 (c) A third-party food delivery service shall record each such verifi- 13 cation required by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subdivision and retain 14 such record for at least one year following the termination of such 15 worker's employment by or engagement with such third-party food delivery 16 service. 17 (d) A third-party food delivery service shall not sell, share, or 18 allow access to such information collected and maintained pursuant to 19 this section unless required to comply with federal, state, or local 20 laws, rules, or regulations. 21 (e) Provided, however, that nothing contained in this subdivision 22 shall be deemed to supersede the provisions of article forty-four-b of 23 the vehicle and traffic law. 24 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 25 it shall have become a law.